Florida, session 2026, SB862.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âCorrectional and 33 Probation Officer Fairness Act.â 34 Section 2.âCompensation of correctional officers, 35 correctional probation officers, and institutional security 36 specialists.â 37 (1)âThe Legislature finds that: 38 (a)âCorrectional officers, correctional probation officers, 39 and institutional security specialists are certified by the 40 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission and are held 41 to the same professional standards as state law enforcement 42 officers. 43 (b)âCorrectional officers, correctional probation officers, 44 and institutional security specialists work in high-risk 45 environments and serve a vital role in public safety, security, 46 and offender supervision. 47 (c)âThere are disparities in compensation among 48 correctional officers, correctional probation officers, and 49 institutional security specialists and state law enforcement 50 officers. 51 (2)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to: 52 (a)âEnsure that correctional officers, correctional 53 probation officers, and institutional security specialists 54 receive compensation consistent with that of state law 55 enforcement officers. 56 (b)âProvide that the Governor may authorize emergency 57 response roles for qualified correctional officers, correctional 58 probation officers, and institutional security specialists 59 during state or federal emergencies. 60 (c)âEstablish fair and consistent annual pay raises that 61 reflect economic realities. 62 (d)âGuarantee permanent pay equity protection for 63 correctional officers, correctional probation officers, and 64 institutional security specialists. 65 (3)(a)âBeginning July 1, 2030, the minimum annual base rate 66 of pay for state employees who are correctional officers (class 67 code 8003), institutional security specialists I (class code 68 8237), and correctional probation officers (class code 8036) may 69 not be less than $60,000. 70 (b)âBy July 1 of each year beginning in 2027, the 71 Department of Management Services shall submit an annual 72 compensation analysis report to the Governor, the President of 73 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 74 which measures progress toward the goal of this subsection and 75 continued compliance with this section. The report should 76 include turnover and vacancy rates for the correctional officer 77 class series, the correctional probation officer class series, 78 and the institutional security specialist class series. 79 (4)(a)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year and each 80 fiscal year thereafter, and subject to legislative 81 appropriation, state correctional officers (class codes 8003, 82 8005, 8011, and 8013), correctional probation officers (class 83 codes 8036, 8039, 8040, 8041, 8045, and 8046), and institutional 84 security specialists (class codes 8237, 8238, and 8240) shall 85 receive an increase to the annual base rate of pay of at least 86 4.5 percent. 87 (b)âThe salary increase in paragraph (a) must be made in 88 addition to any bonuses and merit, retention, or parity 89 increases separately authorized by law or policy. 90 Section 3.âPresent subsections (9) through (12) of section 91 252.36, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (10) 92 through (13), respectively, and a new subsection (9) is added to 93 that section, to read: 94 252.36âEmergency management powers of the Governor.â 95 (9)(a)âIn the event of a declared state or federal 96 emergency, the Governor may issue an executive order for up to 97 60 days which authorizes correctional officers, correctional 98 probation officers, and institutional security specialists to 99 assist state or federal agencies, including, but not limited to, 100 the United States Department of Homeland Security and United 101 States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, in enforcement or 102 support operations. 103 (b)âTo be eligible for the authorization in paragraph (a), 104 a correctional officer, correctional probation officer, or 105 institutional security specialist must: 106 1.âBe actively employed by the state. 107 2.âBe certified by the Criminal Justice Standards and 108 Training Commission. 109 3.âHave at least 5 years of continuous service in a full 110 time capacity as a correctional officer, correctional probation 111 officer, institutional security specialist, or sworn law 112 enforcement officer of this state. 113 (c)âThe Governor may renew an executive order issued under 114 this subsection in 30-day increments as necessary. 115 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.